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DIDYJ-01

DTC

Range)

P1121/19 | Accel. Position Sensor Circuit (IDL SW/

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P1120/19 on page DI-67.

DTC No.

DTC Detection Condition

Trouble Area

P1121/19

Condition (a) or (b) continues 0.05 sec. or more:
(@)IDLONandVA> 1.4V
(b)IDLONandVAS> 1.4V

Condition (a) or (b) continues 0.5 sec. or more: » Openorshortin accelerator pedal position sensor circuit
(a)IDLOFFandVA<0.6V * Accelerator pedal position sensor

(b) IDL OFF and VAS < 0.6 V *Engine ECLL

Conditions (a) and (b) continue 0.05 sec. or more:
(@06V<VA<44Vand06V<VAS<44V
(b)VA -VAS>0.5V

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC P1120/19 on page DI-67.
INSPECTION PROCEDURE

When using intelligent tester II:

1 Connectintelligenttesterlland read IDL signal.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the intelligent tester Il to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester 1l main switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the IDL signal.

OK:
Accelerator pedal IDL signal
Fully open OFF
Fully closed ON

@

Fi7052 OKés to step4.
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2 | Check voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

‘(i&qﬁﬁﬁ%{?ﬂllh I|I|I i I|I|II|I|I I|III CHECK:
(5 8 5 R E i Measure the voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of the en-

\WWW S | gine O

OK:
E2C IDL
Accelerator pedal Voltage
Y A23883 Fully closed 9to 14V
Fully open 0Oto3V

(See page IN-19).

0K> Check and replace engine ECU

@

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN-19).

@

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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4

Connect intelligent tester I, and read accelerator pedal operating percentage.

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

Connect the intelligent tester Il to the DLC3.
Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester Il main switch ON.
CHECK:

Read the accelerator pedal opening percentage.

OK:

Accelerator pedal opening position

Accelerator pedal
expressed as percentage

Fully open Approx. 65%

Fully closed Approx. 18%

(See page DI-4).

OK> Check for intermittent problems

FI7052

@

Check voltage between terminal VCC of wire harness side connector and body
ground (See page DI-67, Step 2).

NG> Go to step 8.

@

Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-67, Step 3).

(See page IN-19).

OK> Check and replace engine ECU

B

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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@

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

8 | Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-67, Step 5).

@

NG>

Check and replace engine ECU

(See page IN-19).

19).

Check for open in harness and connecter between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN-

When not using intelligent tester Il:

1 Checkvoltage between terminals IDLand E2C of engine ECU.
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PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of the en-
gine ECU.
OK:
Accelerator pedal Voltage
Fully closed 9to 14V
Fully open Oto3V
0K> Go to step 3.

2 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN-19).
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Repair or replace harness or connector.
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3

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

3 | Check voltage between terminal 4 of wire harness side connector and body-
ground (See page DI-67, Step 2).

NG> Go to step 6.
OK \

4 | Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-67, Step 3).

(See page IN-19).

OK> Check and replace engine ECU

@

5 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

3

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

6 | Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-67, Step 5).

(See page IN-19).

NG> Check and replace engine ECU
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OK

Check for open in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN-19).
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